Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.45
Agency; weather conditions; continuously apprise.

The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall keep continuously apprised of weather conditions which present danger of precipitation or other climatic activity severe enough to constitute a disaster or emergency.

Laws 1973, LB 494, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 25;

Laws 1996, LB 966, § 2.